Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1953.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(b) Place of application.--An individual who is 21 years of age or older may apply to a sheriff for a license to carry a firearm concealed on or about his person or in a vehicle within this Commonwealth. If the applicant is a resident of this Commonwealth, he shall make application with the [sheriff of the county in which he resides] sheriff's office closest to the applicant's principal residence where the individual lives for the majority of the year and maintains as a permanent residence, or, if a resident of a city of the first class, with the chief of police of that city.12345678910111213141516171819 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1953PN2461 - 2 - 12